South Dakota, session 2026, HB1267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 40-18-2 be AMENDED:
40-18-2. At least three of the five members of the board shall must be persons
who derive the major portion of their income from the livestock business and who are
owners of brands duly recorded with the board. At least three of the five members of the
board shall reside in the livestock ownership inspection areas. No appointed member may
act as a member of the board while holding an elective or appointive state or federal office.
No more than three of the members shall may be of any one political party.
Section 2. That § 40-18-15 be AMENDED:
40-18-15. The board may inspect all livestock moved within the South Dakota
livestock ownership inspection area and all livestock leaving the South Dakota livestock
ownership inspection area this state and all livestock leaving this state for the purpose of
determining the proper ownership and brands, if any, of such the livestock, and shall have
general charge, supervision, and custody of all instruments, records, and files in
connection with such these ownership inspection activities.
Section 3. That § 40-18-16 be AMENDED:
40-18-16. The board may promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, to:
(1) Describe prohibited brand symbols for various types of livestock and identify
locations on animals where a brand is permitted;
(2) Provide for the registration, transfer, and renewal of livestock brands;
(3) Establish a brand registration fee not to exceed fifty dollars;
(4) Establish a brand renewal fee not to exceed eighteen dollars per year or a brand
renewal fee not to exceed ninety dollars for each five-year ownership period and;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.683.23 2 1267
(5) Establish a brand transfer fee not to exceed fifty dollars;
(5)(6) Establish an ownership inspection fee not to exceed one dollar for each head of
livestock;
(6)(7) Establish recordable livestock brands;
(7)(8) Establish law enforcement, ownership inspection, and transportation
requirementswithin or without the ownership inspection area;
(8)(9) Establish a duplicate certificate fee not to exceed twenty dollars;
(9)(10) Establish a mileage fee for inspectors not to exceed the rate set pursuant to
§ 3-9-1; and
(10) Establish an inspection fee for livestock located outside the ownership inspection
area not to exceed one dollar for each head of livestock; and
(11) Establish a brand registration application fee not to exceed fifty dollars.
Section 4. That § 40-18-17 be AMENDED:
40-18-17. The Brand Board board shall provide for the registration of livestock
brands, for the inspection of livestock for ownership identification purposes, and for the
enforcement of laws pertaining to the inspection, sale, branding, ownership,
transportation, and theft of livestock within the ownership inspection area and the this
state.
The board shall conduct outreach and education activities to counties not
previously included under inspection requirements before the transition to mandatory
statewide inspection on July 1, 2029.
Section 5. That § 40-19-10.1 be AMENDED:
40-19-10.1. No person may bring cattle branded with a brand registered in
another state into the ownership inspection area this state for grazing or feeding purposes
without a permit authorized by the board. If the brand is a duplicate of or conflicts with a
brand issued pursuant to this chapter, a permit may only be issued at the discretion of
the board. No permit is required if the cattle are rebranded with a brand registered
pursuant to this chapter. The application for a permit shall must be on a form approved
by the board and shall be signed by the owner of the cattle. Any calves born to cattle
which that are subject to the permit may be branded with the out-of-state brand upon
prior written notice to the board. The calves shall must be added to the permit. No cattle
or calves subject to the permit may be removed from the ownership inspection area this
state, sold, or slaughtered without an ownership inspection.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.683.23 3 1267
No person may brand any cattle imported into or purchased within the ownership
inspection area this state for feeding purposes with a brand registered in another state
without a permit authorized by the board. No permit may be issued if the brand is a
duplicate of or conflicts with a brand issued pursuant to this chapter. The application for
a permit shall must be signed by the owner of the cattle. No cattle subject to the permit
may be removed from the ownership inspection area this state, sold, or slaughtered
without an ownership inspection.
Cattle purchased at a licensed livestock auction market in the ownership inspection
area this state may be branded with the owner's out-of-state brand if the cattle are
branded at the market, are purchased for export from the this state within two calendar
days of purchase, and an authorization form is obtained from the board prior to branding
the cattle.
A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.
Section 6. That § 40-20-4 be AMENDED:
40-20-4. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, it is a Class 2 misdemeanor
to remove or authorize the removal of livestock from any point within the livestock
ownership inspection area, to any point within one mile of the border with a destination
outside the ownership inspection area this state, unless the livestock have been inspected
for ownership and the shipper possesses the local ownership inspection certificate, market
clearance, shipper's permit, or other form of authorization required by the board.
Except as otherwise provided in § 40-20-29, a local ownership inspection certificate
is valid for the transportation of livestock, other than horses, out of the livestock ownership
inspection area this state for twenty-four hours after the time of the inspection, as noted
on the inspection certificate. In the case of horses, the certificate is valid for thirty days
after the date of the inspection, as noted on the certificate.
If there is no valid local ownership inspection certificate, the livestock must be
inspected before leaving the ownership inspection area this state.
Livestock being removed from the ownership inspection area this state, without
authorization from the board, may be impounded by any law enforcement officer, until
the livestock are inspected for ownership by an inspector.
The venue for the prosecution of any offense under this section is the county where
the livestock were loaded, or any county through which the livestock were transported or
trailed.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.683.23 4 1267
Any livestock being transported to a destination outside the ownership inspection
area this state must be inspected for ownership if they cease to be in the custody of the
carrier at any time prior to leaving the ownership inspection area this state.
Any livestock shipper within the livestock ownership inspection area this state
wanting livestock inspected, as provided in this section, shall notify an inspector in
advance of the inspection and allow the inspector reasonable time to provide the
inspection.
Section 7. That § 40-20-4.1 be AMENDED:
40-20-4.1. Notwithstanding the provisions of § 40-20-4, an owner of any livestock
who wishes to move the livestock out of the ownership inspection area this state for any
purpose other than sale or trade of the livestock may obtain a written permit from the
board for movement of the livestock. The written permit shall remain is in effect for the
life of the livestock described, or for a specific term, and it is void if the livestock changes
ownership. The fee for the permit shall must be established by rules promulgated pursuant
to chapter 1-26. The permit fee includes the costs of any inspection and the fee imposed
under the provisions of § 40-18-16. A permit for the transportation of horses and mules
may be authorized by the board pursuant to § 40-18-16.
Section 8. That § 40-20-5 be AMENDED:
40-20-5. If the border of the livestock ownership inspection area of South Dakota
this state divides any ranch or farm, written permission may be given by the board to the
owner or lessee of the ranch or farm to trail livestock out of the South Dakota inspection
area this state for grazing purposes without inspection. The border of the South Dakota
inspection area shall be contiguous to an inspection area of an adjacent state. The board
may cancel such permission at any time subject to the provisions of chapter 1-26.
Section 9. That § 40-20-18 be AMENDED:
40-20-18. Any person in charge or control of any motor vehicle transporting
livestock from any point within the livestock ownership inspection area shall this state
must, upon demand of any state law enforcement officer, exhibit to the officer
authorization as required pursuant to § 40-20-4. It is a Class 2 misdemeanor for any
person not to be in possession of such any authorization if required by the provisions of
this section.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.683.23 5 1267
Section 10. That § 40-20-26 be AMENDED:
40-20-26. It is a Class 1 misdemeanor for any licensed livestock auction market
in the livestock ownership inspection area this state to allow any livestock, brought into
the yards of the market for the purpose of sale, to leave the yards until first without being
inspected for ownership. However, if If a shipment of livestock arrives at any auction
market in the ownership inspection area after daylight hours, facilities shall must be made
available to yard such livestock separate and apart that shipment of livestock separately
from any other livestock. The auction market may sell such livestock from that shipment
that night, but livestock so sold shall any of the livestock sold must be returned to the
separate yard facilities, and may not be removed therefrom until an ownership inspection
has been made. The livestock ownership inspector may, in his discretion, reinspect the
livestock before they leave the yards of the auction market.
Section 11. That § 40-20-26.1 be AMENDED:
40-20-26.1. It is a Class 2 misdemeanor for any person to sell or to transfer
ownership of any livestock within the livestock ownership inspection area this state without
first obtaining an ownership inspection, except as provided in § 40-20-26 §§ 40-20-26
and 40-20-26.2.
Section 12. That § 40-20-26.2 be AMENDED:
40-20-26.2. Notwithstanding § 40-20-26.1, ownership of livestock with the
seller's South Dakota recorded and healed brand or the owner's unbranded livestock may
be transferred by means of an authorized bill of sale, without a brand inspection. The bill
of sale must be on a form prescribed by the board. A copy of the bill of sale must be
forwarded to the board.
An authorized bill of sale is not a substitute for the inspection of livestock being
removed from the ownership inspection area of this state.
An authorized bill of sale may not be used to transfer ownership of more than five
head of livestock to any one buyer. Multiple authorized bills of sale may not be executed
to subdivide numbers of livestock greater than five to any one buyer.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Section 13. That § 40-20-29 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.683.23 6 1267
40-20-29. It is a Class 1 misdemeanor for any person to slaughter or process
livestock commercially within the livestock ownership inspection area until this state
unless the livestock have received an ownership inspection and the certificate of such the
inspection is filed and is made a part of that person's permanent records, or unless the
person has the hide of each slaughtered carcass available for inspection. An ownership
brand inspection certificate on livestock is valid for no longer than four days from the date
of issue. Livestock arriving at a slaughter destination later than four days from the date
indicated on the inspection certificate shall must be inspected and the fee collected. All
certificates of ownership inspection shall, at any time must, upon demand, be displayed
to any state law enforcement officer or to the board.
Section 14. That § 40-20-32 be AMENDED:
40-20-32. Any person who operates a drylot cattle feeding operation, within the
confines of permanently fenced lots and within the ownership inspection area, may apply
to the board for designation as a registered feedlot. The board shall prescribe a form for
this purpose. Upon receipt of an application and within thirty days, the board may grant
a permit if the following requirements are satisfied:
(1) The operator's feedlot is a permanently fenced drylot;
(2) The operator commonly practices feeding cattle to finish for slaughter; and
(3) The operator brands all cattle carrying mixed brands, held under common
ownership, with a registered brand or a feedlot assigned feedlot-assigned brand
approved by the board.
Section 15. That § 40-20-37 be AMENDED:
40-20-37. It is a Class 1 misdemeanor for any buyer of livestock at a licensed
livestock auction market in the ownership inspection area, or any person on the buyer's
behalf, to remove any livestock from the market until the livestock have been inspected
for ownership as provided in § 40-20-26.
Section 16. That § 40-20-39 be AMENDED:
40-20-39. Livestock that is removed from the ownership inspection area this state
in violation of this chapter may be inspected at any place outside the inspection area
location and the fee collected for the inspection. The inspection does not exempt any
person from prosecution for violation of the inspection laws.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.683.23 7 1267
Section 17. That § 40-21-10 be AMENDED:
40-21-10. If any livestock, inspected under the provisions of this chapter or
chapter 40-20 bears an unrecorded brand, or a recorded brand other than the brand of
the person selling the livestock or transporting the livestock out of the ownership
inspection area this state, and does not bear the recorded brand of such the person, then
the person selling or transporting the livestock shall be required to establish ownership to
the livestock, by presenting to the livestock ownership inspector a witnessed bill of sale
to the animal or by other satisfactory evidence of ownership which may include an affidavit
of ownership signed by the person selling or transporting the livestock and witnessed by
the ownership inspector. If any livestock listed on the original bill of sale or affidavit of
ownership are not sold or transported out of the ownership inspection area this state, the
inspector shall must pick up the ownership documents and issue a receipt showing the
number of livestock sold or transported and the number remaining. If any livestock are
unbranded, the inspector may must require the shipper or seller to establish ownership
by presenting to the inspector an affidavit of ownership. Only an original bill of sale or
affidavit of ownership is valid for proof of ownership. Any bill of sale or affidavit shall must
be notarized or signed by two witnesses.
Section 18. That § 40-21-11 be AMENDED:
40-21-11. If any livestock inspected under the provisions of this chapter or
chapter 40-20 bears the recorded brand of the seller or the person transporting the
livestock out of the ownership inspection area this state, and also bears a recorded brand
of another person, then the seller or the person transporting the livestock out of the
ownership inspection area this state may be required, at the discretion of the livestock
ownership inspector, to establish ownership to the livestock by presenting to the
ownership inspector satisfactory evidence of ownership.
Section 19. That § 40-21-12.1 be AMENDED:
40-21-12.1. If the person transporting livestock out of the ownership inspection
area this state, as described in § 40-21-10 or 40-21-11, fails to establish ownership of
any livestock, the board may hold the livestock. If a hold has been placed on the livestock,
it is a Class 1 misdemeanor for the person to remove the livestock from the ownership
inspection area this state or sell the livestock before the board has cleared the hold for
release. Any livestock hold continuing beyond sixty days shall must be forwarded by the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.683.23 8 1267
inspector to the board for review and final disposition, which may include clarification,
settlement, or payment related to proper ownership.
Section 20. That § 40-22-12 be AMENDED:
40-22-12. Any person slaughtering or processing livestock outside the ownership
inspection area shall must, upon demand of any state law enforcement officer, provide
names and dates of persons who delivered livestock for slaughter that may have
originated from within the ownership inspection area.
Section 21. That § 40-20-1 be REPEALED.
The South Dakota livestock ownership inspection area consists of all of that part of
the State of South Dakota lying within the following counties: Harding, Butte, Lawrence,
Pennington, Custer, Fall River, Perkins, Meade, Oglala Lakota, Corson, Dewey, Ziebach,
Haakon, Stanley, Jackson, Jones, Mellette, Bennett, Todd, Lyman, Tripp, and Gregory.
Section 22. That § 40-20-2 be REPEALED.
Any county contiguous to the livestock ownership inspection area may become a
part of such area upon a petition signed by a majority of the owners of livestock residing
within such county to be attached, which shall be presented to the board. The board shall,
in its discretion, either reject or approve such petition at its next regular or special
meeting. No area in the brand inspection area may be smaller than a county.
Section 23. That § 40-20-3 be REPEALED.
Any county which has become a part of the livestock inspection area by petition
and which adjoins a noninspection area may withdraw from the inspection area by a
petition requesting withdrawal. The petition shall be signed by a majority of the owners
of livestock in the county seeking withdrawal. The petition shall be filed with the board.
The board shall at its next regular or special meeting enter a resolution approving the
withdrawal, which action removes the county described in the petition from the ownership
inspection area. No area seeking withdrawal may be smaller than a county.
Section 24. That § 40-20-6 be REPEALED.
Subject to the conditions set forth in §§ 40-20-7 to 40-20-12, inclusive, if livestock
is transported or trailed to a designated inspection point outside the livestock ownership
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.683.23 9 1267
inspection area designated by the board as an open market, no livestock ownership
inspection is required at point of origin.
Section 25. That § 40-20-7 be REPEALED.
In lieu of an ownership inspection, any person who intends to remove livestock
from the livestock ownership inspection area for the purpose of sale or slaughter may
obtain a shipper's permit from the board or its authorized agent for the transportation of
livestock to a previously designated open market or slaughter plant pursuant to § 40-18-
16. The permit may be obtained forty-eight hours in advance of shipment from an
authorized agent of the board.
Section 26. That § 40-20-7.1 be REPEALED.
A market clearance is valid for transporting livestock out of the ownership
inspection area only if the transportation originates at the market where the livestock
were inspected. If the livestock are unloaded or held at any other location other than the
market of origin, they shall be reinspected for ownership immediately prior to further
transportation.
Section 27. That § 40-20-10 be REPEALED.
If authorization is required, it is a Class 2 misdemeanor for a carrier or owner to
transport livestock from the livestock ownership inspection area or to within a mile of the
border with a destination outside the livestock ownership inspection area unless the carrier
or owner is in possession of authorization by the board.
Section 28. That § 40-20-10.1 be REPEALED.
If livestock have been shipped to an open market and no authorization for the
transportation of such livestock has been obtained, the proceeds of the sale of such
livestock shall be held in trust by the operators of the open market until the board
authorizes the release of the proceeds.
Section 29. That § 40-20-12 be REPEALED.
If livestock shipped from the livestock ownership inspection area are consigned to
an open market, as described in § 40-20-6, it is a Class 2 misdemeanor for any person to
change the consignment to a point other than a livestock market previously designated
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.683.23 10 1267
by the board as an open market, unless the livestock receive a livestock ownership
inspection and the carrier receives a certificate or clearance from the board showing that
all the livestock belong to the shipper.
Section 30. That § 40-21-5 be REPEALED.
To facilitate the inspection of livestock and the enforcement of chapters 40-18 to
40-22, inclusive, any livestock market, slaughter facility, or inspection point, whether
within or without the State of South Dakota, that meets the criteria established by the
board may be designated by the board as an open market. The board shall establish
criteria for designating an open market and for revoking open market status by rules
promulgated pursuant to chapter 1-26. Criteria may include distance from the livestock
ownership inspection area, the number of head inspected annually, compliance by the
market with ownership inspection laws, adequacy of the facilities, economic feasibility,
and compliance with the open market agreement. Any livestock market, slaughter facility,
or inspection point designated as an open market by the board shall enter into an open
market agreement with the board on such terms and conditions as may be necessary for
proper brand inspection in accordance with the brand inspection laws and regulations of
this state and of the state in which the livestock market, slaughter facility, or inspection
point is located.
Section 31. This Act is effective beginning July 1, 2029.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.